Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2484.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a section to read:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 Section 613.1. Budget Enactment.--If a general appropriation bill is not enacted by the last day of a fiscal year for the subsequent fiscal year, the General Assembly shall remain in session each weekday, other than official State holidays, until a general appropriation bill for the same fiscal year is enacted.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2484PN3356 - 2 - 1234567